District of Columbia statutes.
1-617.05

Strikes prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any District government employee or labor organization to participate in, authorize, or ratify a strike against the District.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1705, 25 DCR 5740

History

1981 Ed., § 1-618.5.
1973 Ed., § 1-347.5.

Prior Codifications